Illinois, session 104th, SB1244.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Act on the Aging is amended by 5adding Section 4.02j as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 105/4.02j new)7    Sec. 4.02j. Photo identification required. Any person 8providing services under the Community Care Program shall 9prominently display a photo identification badge containing 10the name of the person providing the services, the name of the 11organization the person represents, the occupation of the 12person, and a recent photograph of the person. 13    Section 10. The Home Health, Home Services, and Home 14Nursing Agency Licensing Act is amended by adding Section 6.1 15as follows: 16    (210 ILCS 55/6.1 new)17    Sec. 6.1. Photo identification required. Any person 18providing home services, home health services, or home nursing 19services who is not a member of the patient or consumer's 20family shall prominently display a photo identification badge 21containing the name of the person providing the services, the   SB1244- 2 -LRB104 04102 BAB 14126 b1name of the organization the person represents, the occupation 2of the person, and a recent photograph of the person.